en: Furniture > Beds & Accessories > Beds & Bed Frames: Air Beds; Bunk Beds & Bed Frames; Cabin Beds & Bed Frames; Canopy Beds & Bed Frames; Cot Beds & Bed Frames; Divan Beds & Bed Frames; Four Posters; Loft Beds & Bed Frames; Mid-Century Beds & Bed Frames; Panel Beds & Bed Frames; Platform Beds & Bed Frames; Slat Beds & Bed Frames; Sleigh Beds & Bed Frames; Trundle Beds & Bed Frames; Wall Beds & Bed Frames; Water Beds
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เตียงและอุปกรณ์ > ที่นอนและกรอบเตียง: เตียงลม; เตียงสองชั้นและโครงเตียง; เตียงแบบมีลิ้นชักและโครงเตียง; เตียงมีหลังคาและโครงเตียง; เตียงเด็กและโครงเตียง; เตียงบุนวมและโครงเตียง; สี่เสา; เตียงลอฟท์และโครงเตียง; เตียงยุคกลางศตวรรษและโครงเตียง; เตียงแบบมีหัวเตียงและโครงเตียง; เตียงยกพื้นและโครงเตียง; เตียงไม้ระแนงและโครงเตียง; เตียงเลื่อนและโครงเตียง; เตียงโครงต่ำและโครงเตียง; เตียงติดผนังและโครงเตียง; เตียงน้ำ
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Camas e acessórios > Camas e estruturas de camas: Camas de ar; Beliches e estruturas de cama; Camas de cabine e estruturas de cama; Camas de dossel e estruturas de cama; Camas de berço e estruturas de cama; Camas divãs e estruturas de cama; Quatro postes; Camas altas e estruturas de cama; Camas de meados do século e estruturas de cama; Camas de painel e estruturas de cama; Camas de plataforma e estruturas de cama; Estrados de ripas e estruturas de cama; Camas trenó e estruturas de cama; Camas com gavetão e estruturas de cama; Camas de parede e estruturas de cama; Camas de água
it: Arredamento > Letti e accessori > Letti e telai per letti: Materassi gonfiabili; Letti a castello e telai letto; Letti a soppalco e telai letto; Letti a baldacchino e strutture letto; Lettini e strutture letto; Divani letto e strutture letto; Quattro poster; Letti a soppalco e strutture letto; Letti e strutture letto Mid-Century; Letti a pannelli e strutture letto; Letti con piattaforma e strutture letto; Letti a doghe e strutture letto; Letti a barca e strutture letto; Letti estraibili e strutture letto; Letti a muro e strutture letto; Letti ad acqua
ro-RO: Mobilier > Paturi și accesorii > Paturi și cadre de pat: Saltele pneumatice; Paturi supraetajate și cadre de pat; Paturi rustice și cadre de pat; Paturi cu baldachin și cadre de pat; Paturi pentru copii și cadre de pat; Paturi tip divan și cadre de pat; Paturi cu patru stâlpi; Paturi etajate și cadre de pat; Paturi stil mid-century și cadre de pat; Paturi cu panouri și cadre de pat; Paturi tip platformă și cadre de pat; Paturi cu somiere din scânduri și cadre de pat; Paturi tip sanie și cadre de pat; Paturi extensibile și cadre de pat; Paturi de perete și cadre de pat; Paturi cu apă
el: Έπιπλα > Κρεβάτια & αξεσουάρ > Κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών: Αεροστρώματα; Κουκέτες & πλαίσια κρεβατιών; Κρεβάτια καμπίνας & πλαίσια; Κρεβάτια με ουρανό & πλαίσια; Παιδικά κρεβάτια & πλαίσια; Ντιβάνια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών; Κρεβάτια με τέσσερις κολώνες; Υπερυψωμένα κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών; Κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών τύπου Mid-Century; Κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών τύπου πάνελ; Κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών τύπου πλατφόρμα; Κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών με σχάρες; Κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών τύπου έλκηθρο; Συρόμενα κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών; Επιτοίχια κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών; Κρεβάτια νερού
da: Møbler > Senge og tilbehør > Senge og sengerammer: Luftsenge; Køjesenge og sengerammer; Kabinesenge og sengerammer; Himmelsenge og sengerammer; Tremmesenge og sengerammer; Divan-senge og sengerammer; Fire plakater; Loftssenge og sengerammer; Klassiske senge og sengerammer; Panelsenge og sengerammer; Platformsenge og sengerammer; Lamelsenge og sengerammer; Kanesenge og sengerammer; Trillesenge og sengerammer; Vægsenge og sengerammer; Vandsenge
hu: Bútor > Ágyak és kiegészítők > Ágyak és ágykeretek: Légágyak; Emeletes ágyak és ágykeretek; Kabinágyak és ágykeretek; Baldachinos ágyak és ágykeretek; Kiságyak és ágykeretek; Díványágyak és ágykeretek; Négy oszlopos ágyak; Emelt ágyak és ágykeretek; Századközepi ágyak és ágykeretek; Panelágyak és ágykeretek; Platformágyak és ágykeretek; Lécágyak és ágykeretek; Szánkós ágyak és ágykeretek; Összehúzható ágyak és ágykeretek; Fali ágyak és ágykeretek; Vízágyak
nl: Meubelen > Bedden en accessoires > Bedden en ledikanten: Luchtbedden als meubels; Stapelbedden en -ledikanten; Hutbedden en -ledikanten; Hemelbedden en -ledikanten; Kinderbedden en -ledikanten; Divanbedden en -ledikanten; Testers; Loftbedden en -ledikanten; Mid-centurybedden en -ledikanten; Paneelbedden en -ledikanten; Platformbedden en -ledikanten; Lattenbedden en -ledikanten; Sleebedden en -ledikanten; Onderschuifbedden en -ledikanten; Wandbedden en -ledikanten; Waterbedden
nb: Møbler > Senger og tilbehør > Senger og sengerammer: Luftsenger; Køyesenger og sengerammer; Hyttesenger og sengerammer; Baldakinsenger og sengerammer; Barnesenger og sengerammer; Divansenger og sengerammer; Firesøylers; Loftsenger og sengerammer; Århundresenger og sengerammer; Panelsenger og sengerammer; Plattformsenger og sengerammer; Lamellsenger og sengerammer; Sledesenger og sengerammer; Trillesenger og sengerammer; Veggsenger og sengerammer; Vannsenger
sk-SK: Nábytok > Príslušenstvo k posteliam > Postele a posteľné rámy: Nafukovacie matrace; Rámy poschodových postelí; Rámy multifunkčných poschodových postelí; Rámy postelí s baldachýnom; Rámy detských postieľok; Rámy čalúnených postelí; Postele s baldachýnom; Rámy podkrovných postelí; Rámy retro postelí; Rámy čalúnených postelí; Rámy boxstringových postelí; Rámy postelí s roštom; Rámy postelí so zábranou; Rámy rozkladacích postelí; Rámy sklápacích postelí; Vodné postele
fi: Huonekalut > Sängyt ja tarvikkeet > Sängyt ja sänkykehikot: Ilmasängyt; Kerrossängyt ja sängynrungot; Mökkisängyt ja sängynrungot; Katossängyt ja sängynrungot; Pinnasängyt ja sängynrungot; Divaanisängyt ja sängynrungot; Nelipylväiset sängyt; Parvisängyt ja sängynrungot; Vuosisadan puolivälin sängyt ja sängynrungot; Paneelisängyt ja sängynrungot; Alustasängyt ja sängynrungot; Sälepohjaiset sängyt ja sängynrungot; Rekisängyt ja sängynrungot; Pidennettävät sängyt ja sängynrungot; Seinän sisäiset sängyt ja sängynrungot; Vesisängyt
fr: Meubles > Lits et accessoires > Lits et cadres de lit: Lits pneumatiques; Lits superposés et cadres de lit; Lits cabane et cadres de lit; Lits à baldaquin et cadres de lit; Lits à barreaux et cadres de lit; Divans-lits et cadres de lit; Lits à baldaquin; Lits mezzanine et cadres de lit; Lits milieu du siècle et cadres de lit; Lits à panneaux et cadres de lit; Lits plateforme et cadres de lit; Lits à lattes et cadres de lit; Lits traîneau et cadres de lit; Lits gigognes et cadres de lit; Lits escamotables et cadres de lit; Lits à eau
de: Möbel > Betten & Zubehör > Betten & Bettgestelle: Luftmatratzen; Etagenbetten und Bettrahmen; Hüttenbetten und Bettrahmen; Himmelbetten und Bettrahmen; Kinderbettchen und Bettrahmen; Diwane und Bettrahmen; Vier-Pfosten-Betten; Hochbetten und Bettrahmen; Betten aus der Jahrhundertmitte und Bettrahmen; Betten mit Kopfteil und Bettrahmen; Flachbetten und Bettrahmen; Lattenroste und Bettgestelle; Schlittenbetten und Bettgestelle; Rollbetten und Bettgestelle; Schrankbetten und Bettgestelle; Wasserbetten
bg-BG: Мебели > Легла и аксесоари > Легла и рамки за легла: Надуваеми легла; Двуетажни легла и рамки; Легла с място за съхранение и рамки; Легла с балдахин и рамки за легла; Големи бебешки кошари и рамки; Тапицирани легла и рамки; Легла а рамка за балдахин; Тавански легла и рамки; Средновековни легла и рамки; Панелни легла и рамки; Платформени легла и рамки; Легла с подматрачни рамки; Легла тип шейна и рамки; Легла тип сандвич и рамки; Стенни легла и рамки; Водни легла
vi: Đồ gỗ > Phòng ngủ và phụ kiện phòng ngủ > Giường và khung giường: Giường hơi; Giường tầng và khung giường; Giường cabin và khung giường; Giường có màn quây quanh và khung giường; Giường cũi và khung giường; Giường divan và khung giường; Giường có bốn cọc; Giường gác xép và khung giường; Giường mang phong cách giữa thế kỷ và khung giường; Giường có giát và khung giường; Giường thấp và khung giường; Giường có thanh chắn và khung giường; Giường hình xe trượt tuyết và khung giường; Giường lồng nhau và khung giường; Giường âm tường và khung giường; Giường nước
zh-TW: 家具 > 床和配件 > 床和床架: 氣墊床; 雙層床和床架; 抽屜床和床架; 遮光罩床和床架; 嬰兒床和床架; 木底平台床和床架; 四柱床; 閣樓風床和床架; 中世紀床和床架; 高架床和床架; 床箱床和床架; 框架式高架床和床架; 雪橇床和床架; 附滾輪床和床架; 隱形壁床和床架; 水床
es: Mobiliario > Camas y accesorios > Camas y somieres: Camas de aire; Literas y estructuras de literas; Camas y estructuras de cama de cabina; Camas y estructuras de cama con dosel; Camas y estructuras de cama de cuna; Camas y estructuras de cama tipo diván; Cuatro postes; Camas y estructuras de cama altas; Camas y estructuras de cama de mediados de siglo; Camas y estructuras de cama con paneles; Camas y estructuras de cama con plataforma; Camas y estructuras de cama de láminas; Camas y estructuras de cama tipo trineo; Camas y estructuras de cama nido; Camas y estructuras de cama de pared; Camas de agua
lt-LT: Baldai > Lovos ir priedai > Lovos ir lovų rėmai: Pripučiamos lovos; Dviaukštės lovos ir lovų rėmai; Lovos ir lovų rėmai ant spintelių; Lovos ir lovų rėmai su baldakimu; Sulankstomos lovos ir lovų rėmai; Lovos ir lovų rėmai su patalynės dėže; Lovos su statramsčiais; Paaukštintos lovos ir lovų rėmai; Amžiaus vidurio stiliaus lovos ir lovų rėmai; Skydinės lovos ir lovų rėmai; Platforminės lovos ir lovų rėmai; Lovos ir lovų rėmai su skersiniais; Itin žemos lovos ir lovų rėmai; Lovos ir lovų rėmai su ištraukiamu antru čiužiniu; Sieninės lovos ir lovų rėmai; Vandens lovos
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Postelje in dodatki > Postelje in posteljni okvirji: Zračne postelje; Pogradi in okvirji za postelje; Postelje z dvignjenim okvirjem in posteljni okvirji; Postelje z dvignjenim okvirjem in posteljni okvirji; Postelje s stranskimi stranicami in posteljni okvirji; Divan postelje in posteljni okvirji; Postelje s štirimi stebri; Postelje z dvignjenim okvirjem in posteljni okvirji; Postelje in posteljni okvirji iz sredine 20. stoletja; Postelje z okrasnimi paneli in posteljni okvirji; Postelje in posteljni okvirji s platformo; Postelje z letvicami in posteljni okvirji; Postelje z ukrivljeno obliko in posteljni okvirji; Pomične postelje in posteljni okvirji; Stenske postelje in posteljni okvirji; Vodne postelje
ko: 가구 > 침구/부대용품 > 침대/침대 프레임: 에어베드; 벙커 침대/침대 프레임; 캐빈 침대/침대 프레임; 캐노피 침대/침대 프레임; 간이 침대/침대 프레임; 디반 침대/침대 프레임; 기둥식; 로프트 침대/침대 프레임; 미드센추리 침대/침대 프레임; 패널 침대/침대 프레임; 평상형 침대/침대 프레임; 슬랫 침대/침대 프레임; 슬레이 침대/침대 프레임; 서랍식 이층 침대/침대 프레임; 접이식 벽 침대/침대 프레임; 물침대
hr-HR: Namještaj > Kreveti i dodaci > Kreveti i okviri kreveta: Zračni kreveti; Kreveti i okviri kreveta na kat; Izdignuti kreveti i okviri izdignutih kreveta; Kreveti i okviri kreveta s baldahinom; Dječji kreveti i okviri kreveta; Divan kreveti i okviri kreveta; Kreveti sa stupovima za baldahin; Povišeni kreveti i okviri kreveta; Klasični kreveti i okviri kreveta; Boxspring kreveti i okviri kreveta; Kreveti i okviri kreveta s podnicom; Kreveti i okviri kreveta s letvičastom podnicom; Kreveti i okviri kreveta u obliku saonica; Pomoćni ležajevi i okviri za pomoćne ležajeve; Zidni kreveti i okviri kreveta; Vodeni kreveti
ru: Мебель > Кровати и аксессуары для них > Кровати: Надувные кровати; Двухъярусные кровати; Кровати с ящиками для хранения; Кровати с балдахином; Складные кровати; Диваны-кровати; Кровати с пологом на четырех столбиках; Кровати-чердаки; Кровати в стиле модерна середины XX века; Стандартные кровати; Кровати-платформы; Кровати с реечным основанием; Кровати с изголовьем и изножьем; Выдвижные кровати; Шкафы-кровати; Кровати с водяным матрасом
sv: Möbler > Sängar och tillbehör > Sängar och sängramar: Luftsängar; Våningssängar och sängramar; Stugsängar och sängramar; Himmelsängar och sängramar; Spjälsängar och sängramar; Divansängar och sängramar; Fyra pelare; Loftsängar och sängramar; 50-talssängar och -sängramar; Panelsängar och sängramar; Plattformssängar och sängramar; Ribbsängbottnar och sängramar; Slädsängar och sängramar; Undersängar och sängramar; Väggfasta sängar och sängramar; Vattensängar
ja: 家具 > ベッド・ベッド用品 > ベッド・ベッドフレーム: エアーベッド; 二段ベッド・ベッドフレーム; キャビンベッド・ベッドフレーム; 天蓋付きベッド・ベッドフレーム; ベビーベッド・ベッドフレーム; ディバンベッド・ベッドフレーム; 4ポスター; ロフトベッド・ベッドフレーム; ミッドセンチュリーベッド・ベッドフレーム; パネルベッド・ベッドフレーム; プラットフォームベッド・ベッドフレーム; すのこベッド・ベッドフレーム; そりベッド・ベッドフレーム; トランドルベッド・ベッドフレーム; ウォールベッド・ベッドフレーム; ウォーターベッド
pl: Meble > Łóżka i akcesoria > Łóżka i ramy łóżek: Materace pompowane; Łóżka piętrowe i ramy łóżek; Łóżka kabinowe i ramy łóżek; Łóżka z baldachimem i ramy łóżek; Łóżeczka i ramy; Tapczany i ramy; Łóżka z baldachimem; Łóżka na antresoli i ramy; Łóżka w stylu mid-century modern i ramy; Łóżka panelowe i ramy; Łóżka platformowe i ramy; Łóżka na stelażu i ramy; Łóżka w kształcie sań i ramy; Łóżka wysuwane i ramy; Łóżka chowane w szafie i ramy; Łóżka wodne
zh-CN: 家具 > 床具与配件 > 床和床架: 气垫床; 双层床和床架; 儿童多功能床和床架; 架子床和床架; 婴儿床和床架; 榻榻米床和床架; 四柱床和床架; 高架床和床架; 中世纪床和床架; 板式床和床架; 平台床和床架; 板条床和床架; 雪橇床和床架; 滚床和床架; 壁床和床架; 水床
pt-BR: Móveis > Camas e acessórios > Camas e estruturas de camas: Colchão de ar; Beliches e estruturas de cama; Camas elevadas e estruturas de cama; Camas de dossel e estruturas de cama; Berços e estruturas de cama; Camas divãs e estruturas de cama; Quatro colunas; Camas altas e estruturas de cama; Camas e estruturas de cama de meados do século; Camas de painel e estruturas de cama; Camas de plataforma e estruturas de cama; Camas de ripas e estruturas de cama; Camas trenó e estruturas de cama; Camas com cama auxiliar e estruturas de cama; Camas de parede e estruturas de cama; Camas d'água
cs: Nábytek > Postele a doplňky > Postele a postelové rámy: Nafukovací postele; Dvoupatrové postele a rámy postelí; Patrové postele a postelové rámy; Postele s baldachýnem a postelové rámy; Dětské postele a postelové rámy; Divany a postelové rámy pro divany; Postele s nebesy; Patrové postele a postelové rámy; Mid-century postele a postelové rámy; Postele s pevným roštem a postelové rámy; Platformové postele a postelové rámy; Postele s lamelovým roštem a postelové rámy; Postele se zaoblenými čely a postelové rámy; Výsuvné postele a postelové rámy; Sklápěcí postele a postelové rámy; Vodní postele
tr: Mobilyalar > Yataklar ve Aksesuarlar > Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri: Hava Yatakları; Ranzalar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Kabin Yatakları ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Cibinlikli Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Bebek Yatakları ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Divan Yatakları ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Sayvanlı Yatak; Yüksek Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Yüzyıl Ortası Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Panel Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Platform Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Çıtalı Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Kızak Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Tekerlekli Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Duvar Yatakları ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Su Yatakları